Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-578
Boundaries; change; protest petition; disqualification of signer.

Any person who signs a petition for the annexation of any tract or tracts of land to such district as the owner of any land shall be disqualified to sign a protest petition.

Laws 1951, c. 147, § 5, p. 591.